California statutes. Labor Code
 “policies and practices that will close the employment and wage gap for Californians,” “strategies for engaging employers in the creation of good, high-wage jobs of the future,” and “workforce development, training, education, and apprenticeship programs for the jobs of the future.”

(b) In March 2021, the Future of Work Commission issued its report, “A New Social Compact for Work and Workers,” recommending that, among other actions, California help (1) ensure the creation of sufficient numbers of jobs for everyone who wants to work, including by extending financial and technical assistance to mission-oriented businesses, (2) eliminate working poverty, including by creating supports for workers to organize in unions and worker associations as well as supporting “high-road” employment, (3) create a 21st-century worker benefits model and safety net, including by developing a portable benefits platform and encouraging apprenticeship and other
 skill-building programs, (4) raise the standard and share of quality jobs, including by creating a California Job Quality Incubator to support the increase of high-quality jobs, and (5) futureproof California with jobs and skills to prepare for technology, climate, and other shocks, including by providing incentives to the private sector to invest in worker training.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that a California-focused federated worker cooperative system may advance these objectives by encouraging the expansion of democratically run high-road cooperative businesses that promote equitable economic development, reduce inequality, and increase access to living-wage jobs. Worker cooperatives have been shown to convey wealthbuilding and other significant benefits to workers, including autonomy from larger economic forces, more resiliency during economic downturns, lower workforce turnover, greater voice in health, safety, and other
 workplace issues, and more equitable pay. The Legislature wishes to study how a federated worker cooperative system could advance the goals of the Future of Work Commission, particularly as they apply to historically underresourced communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   (AB 2849)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10005. - 10005.]

10005.

For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Association” means the Association of Cooperative Labor Contractors.

(b) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   (AB 2849)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Study [10010. - 10010.]

10010.

(a) There is hereby established in state government a panel to conduct a study regarding the creation of an Association of Cooperative Labor Contractors for the purpose of facilitating the growth of democratically run high-road cooperative labor contractors. The panel shall be assisted in this task by staff from the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a subsidiary department thereof selected by the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development.

(b) The panel shall consist of all of the following members:

(1) The secretary or the director of a subsidiary department thereof selected by the secretary.

(2) The Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(3) An appointee of the Speaker of the Assembly.

(4) An appointee of the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(5) A representative from the Future of Work Commission selected by the Governor.

(c) In preparing the study, the panel may retain outside experts on high-road jobs, worker cooperatives, business formation, and other topics
 pertinent to the association.

(d) The study shall consider, at a minimum, how to do all of the following:

(1) Advance the goals of the Future of Work Commission within the association.

(2) Incentivize the growth of the association and its members.

(3) Promote tenets of democratic worker control, including, but not limited to, uniform hiring and ownership eligibility criteria, worker-owners working most hours worked, most voting ownership interest being held by worker-owners, most voting power being held by worker-owners, and worker-owners exercising their vote on a one-person, one-vote basis.

(4) Ensure that the association’s members offer high-road jobs, which include, but are not limited
 to, jobs with the right to organize and participate in labor organizations and jobs with minimum labor standards, such as a minimum wage in excess of the otherwise applicable minimum wage, a compensation ratio between the highest and lowest paid employees, minimum health expenditures, minimum retirement expenditures, and protections for individuals who have gone through the criminal justice system.

(e) In preparing the study, the panel shall engage in a stakeholder process by which it consults with, at a minimum, organized labor, worker cooperatives, and business groups that can assess the opportunities and challenges associated with expanding workplace democracy in the major sectors of the economy throughout the state.

(f) The panel shall complete the study and make it publicly available on the internet no later than June 30, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   (AB 2849)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. CALIFORNIA WORKPLACE OUTREACH PROGRAM [11000. - 11005.]

11000.

(a) The Department of Industrial Relations, upon appropriation of funds to the department for this purpose, shall establish and administer the California Workplace Outreach Program.

(b) The purpose of the program shall be to promote awareness of, and compliance with, workplace protections that affect California workers, with a focus on low-wage, high-risk, and high-violation industries.

(c) The department shall consult and collaborate with the Civil Rights Department when the program’s outreach and education materials involve protections under the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code)
 or any statute referenced in subdivision (f) of Section 12930 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 11005.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) “Program” means the California Workplace Outreach Program.

(c) “Qualified organization” means a nonprofit organization with demonstrated experience in carrying out in-person outreach and education directed at workers in industries and demographic groups deemed by the department or its divisions to be vulnerable to violations of workplace protections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 11005.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

The department shall issue a competitive request for application for qualified organizations to provide education and outreach services to workers and to assist workers to assert their workplace rights. The department may require qualified organizations to participate in training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 11005.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

(a) The department shall guide discussions with qualified organizations regarding priority topics for outreach and education, which may include, but are not limited to, minimum wage, overtime, paid leave, retaliation, health and safety, excessive heat, discrimination protections, the adjudication processes of the Department of Industrial Relations and issues that affect certain low-wage, high-risk, and high-violation industries differently.

(b) The department shall consult with qualified organizations and the Labor and Workforce Development Agency and, as relevant, its departments and boards to create education and outreach materials informing workers of their rights on priority topics and training materials for workers and organizations. The
 materials shall be translated into non-English languages, to be determined by the department in consultation with each qualified organization, as appropriate for the geographic region the qualified organization serves. The department may require its final approval of education, outreach, and training materials, and organizations shall implement any changes required by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 11005.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

The department and qualified organizations shall meet twice a year, or more frequently at the discretion of the department, to coordinate efforts around outreach and education, and for qualified organizations to share information relevant to enforcement activities of the department, in accordance with applicable privacy and confidentiality laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 11005.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

This division shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Division 7, commencing with Section 11000.)
-------------------------------------------

